Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.440

Default.

(1) Failure of a party to file an application for an adjudicative proceeding within the time limit or limits established by statute or agency rule constitutes a default and results in the loss of that party's right to an adjudicative proceeding, and the agency may proceed to resolve the case without further notice to, or hearing for the benefit of, that party, except that any default or other dispositive order affecting that party shall be served upon him or her or upon his or her attorney, if any.

(2) If a party fails to attend or participate in a hearing or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding, other than failing to timely request an adjudicative proceeding as set out in subsection (1) of this section, the presiding officer may serve upon all parties a default or other dispositive order, which shall include a statement of the grounds for the order.

(3) Within seven days after service of a default order under subsection (2) of this section, or such longer period as provided by agency rule, the party against whom it was entered may file a written motion requesting that the order be vacated, and stating the grounds relied upon. During the time within which a party may file a written motion under this subsection, the presiding officer may adjourn the proceedings or conduct them without the participation of that party, having due regard for the interests of justice and the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceedings.

[ 1989 c 175 s 16; 1988 c 288 s 411.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.